snowball/lithuanian.sbl
/*++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++*/
// author:     Ž. Medelis
// extensions: M. Petkevičius
// extensions: T. Krilavičius
//
// description: Snowball version of Porter stemmer for Lithuanian language
// rules: 
//    1) jeigu ilgesnis nei 3
//    2) jeigu baigiasi tis, tas keiciam i t, PRE = true
//    3) jeigu !PRE 
//        ieskom galuniu, 
//        ir jeigu ilgis be galunes daugiau uz 2, DELETE, FOUND1 = true
//    4) jeigu FOUND keiciam tč ir dž, CHANGE = true
//    5) jeigu FOUND arba PRE ir !CHANGE
//      51) for 3x
//        511) jeigu baigiasi galune ir ilgis daugiau uz 2 - DELETE
//             isimtis galune UK, jei tai nera AUK - DELETE UK
//    6) jeigu CHANGE ieskom priesagos po pakeitimo - DELETE
//    7) keiciam tch ir dzh
// compilation
// --- c/c++, options:
//  -output - output dir and file names; -utf8
//  ./Snowball.exe algorithms/lithuanian/lithuanian.sbl -output dir/lithuanian -utf8
// --- java, options: 
//   -output - output dir and fnames; -name - class name; -java - generate java; -utf8
//  cli:
//   ./Snowball.exe algorithms/lithuanian/lithuanian.sbl -output lithuanian/lithuanian -utf8 -name lithuanian_stemmer -java
//
/*++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++*/


/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// external call API
externals ( stem )
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
/* Special characters in Unicode Latin-1 and Latin Extended-A */
// ' nosine 
stringdef a'   decimal '261'  // ą a + ogonek
stringdef e'   decimal '281'  // ę e + ogonek
stringdef i'   decimal '303'  // į i + ogonek
stringdef u'   decimal '371'  // ų u + ogonek

// . taskas
stringdef e.   decimal '279'  // ė e + dot

// - ilgoji
stringdef u-   decimal '363'  // ū u + macron 

// * varnele
stringdef c*   decimal '269'  // č c + caron (haček)
stringdef s*   decimal '353'  // š s + caron (haček)
stringdef z*   decimal '382'  // ž z + caron (haček)
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// [C](VC)^m[V|C]
// definitions of variables for
// p1 - position of m = 0
// p2 - position of m = 1
integers ( p1 p2 )
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// booleans - to be commented
// PRE
// FOUND
// CHANGE  
booleans ( PRE FOUND CHANGE )
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// escape symbols for substituting lithuanian characters
stringescapes { }
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// groupings
// v - lithuanian vowels
groupings ( v )
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// v - all lithuanian vowels
define v 'aeiyou{a'}{e'}{i'}{u'}{e.}{u-}'
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// all lithuanian stemmer routines: 5 steps 
routines (
  step1_noun // comments to be added
  step2 //
  step3 //
  step4 //
  step5 //
  mark_regions  // define [C] and [C]VC positions
  R1            // [C]VC position
  // R2            // [C]VCVC position  
)
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// [C](VC)^m[V|C]
// mark regions for
// p1 - position of m = 0
// p2 - position of m = 1 
define mark_regions as (
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit
    do(
      gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
      gopast non-v  setmark p2
    )
)
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/

/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
// -------------------------- stemming rules
// rules
backwardmode(

// 
  define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
//  define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

/*===================================*/
// --- step1: to be commented
// endings: tis, tas  
  define step1_noun as
  ( //not R1
    [substring] among
    (
      'tis'   // *tis -> t
      'tas'   // *tas -> t
      (<-'t' set PRE)
    )
  )
/*===================================*/

/*===================================*/  
// --- step2: to be commented
  define step2 as
  ( not PRE //and not R1
  [substring] among
    (
      'uosiuose'
      'aisiais' 'iesiems'
      'osioms' '{e.}jausi' 'uosius'
      'usios' 'usius' 'amasi' 'osios' 'osiom' 'iomis' 'iajam' 'ajame' 'ianti'
      'ajam' 'asis' 'am{e.}s' 'uoju' 'uoji' 'uoja' 'usis' 'omis' 'ieji' 'ioji'
          'iaus' 'iais' 'iant' 'anti' 'inti'
      'iuose'
      'iasi' 'iams'  'ioje'  'iose'  'uose'  'iems'  '{e.}mis'  'umas'  
          't{u'}j{u'}' 'iame' 'toje'
      'ios' '{a'}j{i'}' '{a'}j{a'}' 'i{a'}s' 'oms' 'iau' 'asi' 'ose'  'oje'
          'ojo'  'oji'  'yse'  'yje'
      'iai'  'ias'  'ies'  'ius'  '{e.}se' '{e.}je'  'ers'  'ens'  'ais'  'ams'
          'aus'  'iui'  'umu'
      '{e.}ms'  'iam'  'imo' 'yti' 'uos' 'ant' 'osi'
      'om' 'oj' 'os'  'uo'  'us'  'ys'  'ia'  'i{a'}'  '{e.}s'  'es'  'ei' 'as'
          'ai'   'ui'  'iu'  'io' '{u-}s'  'ti' '{a'}s'
      '{e'}s' 'is' 'i{u'}'
      '{u'}' 'u' 'o'  '{i'}'  'i'  '{e'}'  '{e.}'  'e'  '{a'}'  'a'  's'
      (set FOUND delete)
    )
  )
/*===================================*/

/*===================================*/
// -- step3: to be commented
  define step3 as
  ( FOUND // and not R1
    [substring] among
    (
      '{c*}' (<-'t' set CHANGE)
      'd{z*}' (<-'d' set CHANGE)
    )
  )
/*===================================*/  

/*===================================*/  
// -- step4: to be commented
  define step4 as
  ( FOUND or PRE and not CHANGE loop 3
  // FOUND or PRE and not CHANGE //and not R1 loop 3
    [substring] among
    (
      'uomen' 'inink'
      'ok{s*}n' 'iaus' 'enyb' 'ojim' '{e.}jim' 'imas' 'avus' 'ulyt' 'iuoj'
          'iant'
      'iul' 'ant' 'uos' 'uoj' 'iuk' 'dam' 'dav' 'auj' 'ain' 'i{s*}k' 'eiv' 'int'
          'uol' 'tok' 'toj' 'tas' 'iam' 'iau' 'iav'
      'atv' 'yst' 'ien' 'ykl' 'tuv' 'tuk' 'ikl' 'esn' 'ekl' 'sen' 'tyn' 'izm'
          'jim' '{e.}t' 'ia' '{e.}z' '{s*}{e.}' 'u{z*}' 'yt' 'el' 'av'
      'uk' 'oj' '{e.}n' 'om' 'o{c*}' '{e.}j' 'ij'
      'iuo'  //buriuoti
      'uo' 'um' 'yk' '{e.}s' 'in' '{u-}n' 'ik' '{e.}l' 'yb' 'sm' 'es' 'ym'
        (delete)
    )
  )
/*===================================*/  

/*===================================*/
// step5: to be commented
  define step5 as
  ( CHANGE // and not R1
    [substring] among
    (
      'i{u-}k{s*}t' 'iant'
        (delete)
    )
  )
)
/*===================================*/

/*===================================*/
// stemmer
define stem as
(
  unset PRE
  unset FOUND
  unset CHANGE
  do mark_regions
  backwards
  (
    do step1_noun
    do step2
    do step3
    do step4
    do step5
    do step3
  )
)
/*----------------------------------------------------------------------------*/
